Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3826
Corporation; taxation.

Any corporation organized pursuant to sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 shall be subject to taxation under the provisions of Chapter 77, article 9, to the extent that direct writing premiums are subject to taxation under such article.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 26.